Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2704
Civic and Community Center Financing Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Civic and Community Center Financing Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the department. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund. Transfers may be made from the Civic and Community Center Financing Fund to the General Fund, the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund, and the State Colleges Sport Facilities Cash Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

(2)(a) The department shall use the Civic and Community Center Financing Fund for the following purposes:

(i) For grants of assistance as described in section 13-2704.01;

(ii) For grants of assistance as described in section 13-2704.02; and

(iii) For reasonable and necessary costs of the department directly related to the administration of the fund.

(b) Grants of assistance shall not be used for programming, marketing, advertising, or facility-staffing activities.

(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the Civic and Community Center Financing Fund to the State Colleges Sport Facilities Cash Fund on October 1 of 2012, 2013, and 2014. Commencing October 1, 2015, and every year thereafter, the State Treasurer shall transfer three hundred thousand dollars from the Civic and Community Center Financing Fund to the State Colleges Sport Facilities Cash Fund.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 16;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB779, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB297, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB969, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB153, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB661, § 29;

Laws 2019, LB564, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB1009, § 3;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.